Washington statutes.
RCW 18.92.015

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Board" means the Washington state veterinary board of governors.

(2) "Department" means the department of health.

(3) "Secretary" means the secretary of the department of health.

(4) "Veterinary medication clerk" means a person who has satisfactorily completed a board-approved training program developed in consultation with the pharmacy quality assurance commission and designed to prepare persons to perform certain nondiscretionary functions defined by the board and used in the dispensing of legend and nonlegend drugs (except controlled substances as defined in or under chapter 69.50 RCW) associated with the practice of veterinary medicine.

(5) "Veterinary technician" means a person who is licensed by the board upon meeting the requirements of RCW 18.92.128.

[ 2013 c 19 s 43; 2007 c 235 s 1; 2000 c 93 s 9; 1993 c 78 s 1; 1991 c 332 s 40; 1991 c 3 s 238; 1983 c 102 s 1; 1979 c 158 s 71; 1974 ex.s. c 44 s 1; 1967 ex.s. c 50 s 1; 1959 c 92 s 2; 1941 c 71 s 21; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 10040-21. Formerly RCW 18.92.010, part.]

NOTES:

Captions not law—1991 c 332: See note following RCW 18.130.010.